District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-171.05

Review by District Auditor.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-132, § 6, 28 DCR 445
Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 2404, 47 DCR 6308

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 2-905.
1981 Ed., § 1-1905.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) repeal of section, see § 2404 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2404 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).

Mayor's Orders

Interagency energy task force established: See Mayor’s Order 86-61, April 22, 1986.